Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.365

Executive branch agencies—Ethics advisors—Ethics training.

(1) Each executive branch agency shall designate an ethics advisor or advisors to assist the agency's employees in understanding their obligations under the ethics in public service act. Agencies shall inform the executive ethics board of their designated advisors. As funding permits and as determined by the executive ethics board and the agency head, the advisors shall receive regular ethics training.

(2) Executive branch officers and employees are encouraged to attend ethics training offered by the executive ethics board at least once every thirty-six months.

[ 2013 c 190 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—2013 c 190: See note following RCW 42.52.410.